apertium-sme-smj.smj.dix
    <pardef n="hármma/t__Pron_Indef">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dada</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadak</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadagá</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadagi</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadaga</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadakga</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadagága</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadagiga</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadage</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadak</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadakge</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadagáge</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadagák</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadagige</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadagik</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadagen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadakgen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadagágen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dadagigen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dijn</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dijnga</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dijnge</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dijngen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dis</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>disga</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>disge</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>disgen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dij</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dijga</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dijge</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dijgen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>din</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dinga</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dinge</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dingen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tga</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tge</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tgen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>daga</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dage</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dak</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dagen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dav</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>davga</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>davge</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>davgen</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dijda</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dijdak</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dijdagá</l>
          <r>t<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>

    <e lm="hármmat"><i>hármma</i><par n="hármma/t__Pron_Indef"/></e>
